Ohio, session 136, HB978.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO: Section 1. That sections 109.572, 503.41, 3767.10, and 5101.87 be amended and sections 109.45, 109.451, 109.452, 109.453, 109.454, 109.455, 2905.34, 3724.01, 3724.02, 3724.03, 3724.04, 3724.05, 3724.06, 3724.07, 3724.99, and 5502.71 of the Revised Code be enacted to read as follows: Sec. 109.45. As used in sections 109.45 to 109.455 of the Revised Code, "massage operations" has the same meaning as in section 2905.34 of the Revised Code. Sec. 109.451. A person conducting massage operations shall use a financial transaction device to receive payment for all services provided by the person. As used in this section, "financial transaction device" has the same meaning as in section 113.40 of the Revised Code. Sec. 109.452. A person conducting massage operations shall report to the attorney general the payroll of all employees and shall cross-reference in the report the license number for each employee licensed under sections 503.40 to 503.50 or 715.61 of the Revised Code or Chapter 3724. of the Revised Code. Sec. 109.453. No person conducting massage operations shall classify an employee of the person as an independent contractor. Sec. 109.454. The illicit massage task force is created in the office of the attorney general to monitor suspicious transactions and to investigate and correct erroneous employee classification as an independent contractor regarding massage operations. Sec. 109.455. The attorney general shall adopt rules under Chapter 119. of the Revised Code governing the requirements of sections 109.45 to 109.455 of the Revised Code, including rules that do the following: (A) Establish the method and manner of reporting employee payroll under section 109.452 of the Revised Code; (B) Guide persons conducting massage operations in designating individuals as employees or independent contractors for purposes of sections 109.452 and 109.453 of the Revised Code; (C) Establish standards for persons conducting massage operations as to what transactions should be considered suspicious for purposes of section 109.454 of the Revised Code; (D) Provide guidance as to the operations, activities, and duties of the illicit massage task force under section 109.454 of the Revised Code. Sec. 109.572. (A)(1) Upon receipt of a request pursuant to section 121.08, 3301.32, 3301.541, or 3319.39 of the Revised Code, a completed form prescribed pursuant to division (C)(1) of this section, and a set of fingerprint impressions obtained in the manner described in division (C)(2) of this section, the superintendent of the bureau of criminal identification and investigation shall conduct a criminal records check in the manner described in division (B) of this section to determine whether any information exists that indicates that the person who is the subject of the request previously has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to any of the following: (a) A violation of section 2903.01, 2903.02, 2903.03, 2903.04, 2903.041, 2903.06, 2903.08, 2903.11, 2903.12, 2903.13, 2903.16, 2903.21, 2903.34, 2905.01, 2905.02, 2905.05, 2905.11, 2905.32, 2907.02, 2907.03, 2907.04, 2907.05, 2907.06, 2907.07, 2907.08, 2907.09, 2907.19, 2907.21, 2907.22, 2907.23, 2907.25, 2907.31, 2907.32, 2907.321, 2907.322, 2907.323, 2911.01, 2911.02, 2911.11, 2911.12, 2919.12, 2919.22, 2919.24, 2919.25, 2923.12, 2923.13, 2923.161, 2923.17, 2923.21, 2923.42, 2925.02, 2925.03, 2925.04, 2925.041, 2925.05, 2925.06, 2925.13, 2925.22, 2925.23, 2925.24, 2925.31, 2925.32, 2925.36, 2925.37, or 3716.11 of the Revised Code, felonious sexual penetration in violation of former section 2907.12 of the Revised Code, a violation of section 2905.04 of the Revised Code as it existed prior to July 1, 1996, a violation of section 2919.23 of the Revised Code that would have been a violation of section 2905.04 of the Revised Code as it existed prior to July 1, 1996, had the violation been committed prior to that date, or a violation of section 2925.11 of the Revised Code that is not a minor drug possession offense; (b) A violation of an existing or former law of this state, any other state, or the United States that is substantially equivalent to any of the offenses listed in division (A)(1)(a) of this section; (c) If the request is made pursuant to section 3319.39 of the Revised Code for an applicant who is a teacher, any offense specified under section 9.79 of the Revised Code or in section 3319.31 of the Revised Code. (2) On receipt of a request pursuant to section 3712.09 or 3721.121 of the Revised Code, a completed form prescribed pursuant to division (C)(1) of this section, and a set of fingerprint impressions obtained in the manner described in division (C)(2) of this section, the superintendent of the bureau of criminal identification and investigation shall conduct a criminal records check with respect to any person who has applied for employment in a position for which a criminal records check is required by those sections. The superintendent shall conduct the criminal records check in the manner described in division (B) of this section to determine whether any information exists that indicates that the person who is the subject of the request previously has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to any of the following: (a) A violation of section 2903.01, 2903.02, 2903.03, 2903.04, 2903.11, 2903.12, 2903.13, 2903.16, 2903.21, 2903.34, 2905.01, 2905.02, 2905.11, 2905.12, 2907.02, 2907.03, 2907.05, 2907.06, 2907.07, 2907.08, 2907.09, 2907.12, 2907.25, 2907.31, 2907.32, 2907.321, 2907.322, 2907.323, 2911.01, 2911.02, 2911.11, 2911.12, 2911.13, 2913.02, 2913.03, 2913.04, 2913.11, 2913.21, 2913.31, 2913.40, 2913.43, 2913.47, 2913.51, 2919.25, 2921.36, 2923.12, 2923.13, 2923.161, 2925.02, 2925.03, 2925.11, 2925.13, 2925.22, 2925.23, or 3716.11 of the Revised Code; (b) An existing or former law of this state, any other state, or the United States that is substantially equivalent to any of the offenses listed in division (A)(2)(a) of this section. (3) On receipt of a request pursuant to section 173.27, 173.38, 173.381, 3740.11, 5119.34, 5164.34, 5164.341, 5164.342, 5123.081, or 5123.169 of the Revised Code, a completed form prescribed pursuant to division (C)(1) of this section, and a set of fingerprint impressions obtained in the manner described in division (C)(2) of this section, the superintendent of the bureau of criminal identification and investigation shall conduct a criminal records check of the person for whom the request is made. The superintendent shall conduct the criminal records check in the manner described in division (B) of this section to determine whether any information exists that indicates that the person who is the subject of the request previously has been convicted of, has pleaded guilty to, or (except in the case of a request pursuant to section 5164.34, 5164.341, or 5164.342 of the Revised Code) has been found eligible for intervention in lieu of conviction for any of the following, regardless of the date of the conviction, the date of entry of the guilty plea, or (except in the case of a request pursuant to section 5164.34, 5164.341, or 5164.342 of the Revised Code) the date the person was found eligible for intervention in lieu of conviction: (a) A violation of section 959.13, 959.131, 2903.01, 2903.02, 2903.03, 2903.04, 2903.041, 2903.11, 2903.12, 2903.13, 2903.15, 2903.16, 2903.21, 2903.211, 2903.22, 2903.34, 2903.341, 2905.01, 2905.02, 2905.05, 2905.11, 2905.12, 2905.32, 2905.33, 2907.02, 2907.03, 2907.04, 2907.05, 2907.06, 2907.07, 2907.08, 2907.09, 2907.21, 2907.22, 2907.23, 2907.24, 2907.25, 2907.31, 2907.32, 2907.321, 2907.322, 2907.323, 2907.33, 2909.02, 2909.03, 2909.04, 2909.22, 2909.23, 2909.24, 2911.01, 2911.02, 2911.11, 2911.12, 2911.13, 2913.02, 2913.03, 2913.04, 2913.05, 2913.11, 2913.21, 2913.31, 2913.32, 2913.40, 2913.41, 2913.42, 2913.43, 2913.44, 2913.441, 2913.45, 2913.46, 2913.47, 2913.48, 2913.49, 2913.51, 2917.01, 2917.02, 2917.03, 2917.31, 2919.12, 2919.121, 2919.123, 2919.124, 2919.22, 2919.23, 2919.24, 2919.25, 2921.03, 2921.11, 2921.12, 2921.13, 2921.21, 2921.24, 2921.32, 2921.321, 2921.34, 2921.35, 2921.36, 2921.51, 2923.12, 2923.122, 2923.123, 2923.13, 2923.161, 2923.162, 2923.21, 2923.32, 2923.42, 2925.02, 2925.03, 2925.04, 2925.041, 2925.05, 2925.06, 2925.09, 2925.11, 2925.13, 2925.14, 2925.22, 2925.23, 2925.24, 2925.36, 2925.55, 2925.56, 2927.12, or 3716.11 of the Revised Code; (b) Felonious sexual penetration in violation of former section 2907.12 of the Revised Code; (c) A violation of section 2905.04 of the Revised Code as it existed prior to July 1, 1996; (d) A violation of section 2923.01, 2923.02, or 2923.03 of the Revised Code when the underlying offense that is the object of the conspiracy, attempt, or complicity is one of the offenses listed in divisions (A)(3)(a) to (c) of this section; (e) A violation of an existing or former municipal ordinance or law of this state, any other state, or the United States that is substantially equivalent to any of the offenses listed in divisions (A)(3)(a) to (d) of this section. (4) On receipt of a request pursuant to section 2151.86, 2151.904, or 5103.053 of the Revised Code, a completed form prescribed pursuant to division (C)(1) of this section, and a set of fingerprint impressions obtained in the manner described in division (C)(2) of this section, the superintendent of the bureau of criminal identification and investigation shall conduct a criminal records check in the manner described in division (B) of this section to determine whether any information exists that indicates that the person who is the subject of the request previously has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to any of the following: (a) A violation of section 959.13, 2151.421, 2903.01, 2903.02, 2903.03, 2903.04, 2903.041, 2903.06, 2903.08, 2903.11, 2903.12, 2903.13, 2903.15, 2903.16, 2903.21, 2903.211, 2903.22, 2903.32, 2903.34, 2905.01, 2905.02, 2905.05, 2905.32, 2907.02, 2907.03, 2907.04, 2907.05, 2907.06, 2907.07, 2907.08, 2907.09, 2907.19, 2907.21, 2907.22, 2907.23, 2907.25, 2907.31, 2907.32, 2907.321, 2907.322, 2907.323, 2909.02, 2909.03, 2909.22, 2909.23, 2909.24, 2911.01, 2911.02, 2911.11, 2911.12, 2913.49, 2917.01, 2917.02, 2919.12, 2919.22, 2919.24, 2919.25, 2923.12, 2923.13, 2923.161, 2923.17, 2923.21, 2925.02, 2925.03, 2925.04, 2925.041, 2925.05, 2925.06, 2925.13, 2925.22, 2925.23, 2925.24, 2925.31, 2925.32, 2925.36, 2925.37, 2927.12, or 3716.11 of the Revised Code, a violation of section 2905.04 of the Revised Code as it existed prior to July 1, 1996, a violation of section 2919.23 of the Revised Code that would have been a violation of section 2905.04 of the Revised Code as it existed prior to July 1, 1996, had the violation been committed prior to that date, a violation of section 2925.11 of the Revised Code that is not a minor drug possession offense, two or more OVI or OVUAC violations committed within the three years immediately preceding the submission of the application or petition that is the basis of the request, or felonious sexual penetration in violation of former section 2907.12 of the Revised Code, or a violation of Chapter 2919. of the Revised Code that is a felony; (b) A violation of an existing or former law of this state, any other state, or the United States that is substantially equivalent to any of the offenses listed in division (A)(4)(a) of this section. (5) Upon receipt of a request pursuant to section 5104.013 of the Revised Code, a completed form prescribed pursuant to division (C)(1) of this section, and a set of fingerprint impressions obtained in the manner described in division (C)(2) of this section, the superintendent of the bureau of criminal identification and investigation shall conduct a criminal records check in the manner described in division (B) of this section to determine whether any information exists that indicates that the person who is the subject of the request has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to any of the following: (a) A violation of section 2151.421, 2903.01, 2903.02, 2903.03, 2903.04, 2903.11, 2903.12, 2903.13, 2903.16, 2903.21, 2903.22, 2903.34, 2905.01, 2905.02, 2905.05, 2905.11, 2905.32, 2907.02, 2907.03, 2907.04, 2907.05, 2907.06, 2907.07, 2907.08, 2907.09, 2907.19, 2907.21, 2907.22, 2907.23, 2907.24, 2907.25, 2907.31, 2907.32, 2907.321, 2907.322, 2907.323, 2909.02, 2909.03, 2909.04, 2909.05, 2911.01, 2911.02, 2911.11, 2911.12, 2913.02, 2913.03, 2913.04, 2913.041, 2913.05, 2913.06, 2913.11, 2913.21, 2913.31, 2913.32, 2913.33, 2913.34, 2913.40, 2913.41, 2913.42, 2913.43, 2913.44, 2913.441, 2913.45, 2913.46, 2913.47, 2913.48, 2913.49, 2917.01, 2917.02, 2917.03, 2917.31, 2919.12, 2919.22, 2919.224, 2919.225, 2919.24, 2919.25, 2921.03, 2921.11, 2921.13, 2921.14, 2921.34, 2921.35, 2923.01, 2923.12, 2923.13, 2923.161, 2925.02, 2925.03, 2925.04, 2925.05, 2925.06, or 3716.11 of the Revised Code, felonious sexual penetration in violation of former section 2907.12 of the Revised Code, a violation of section 2905.04 of the Revised Code as it existed prior to July 1, 1996, a violation of section 2919.23 of the Revised Code that would have been a violation of section 2905.04 of the Revised Code as it existed prior to July 1, 1996, had the violation been committed prior to that date, a violation of section 2925.11 of the Revised Code that is not a minor drug possession offense, a violation of section 2923.02 or 2923.03 of the Revised Code that relates to a crime specified in this division, or a second violation of section 4511.19 of the Revised Code within five years of the date of application for licensure or certification. (b) A violation of an existing or former law of this state, any other state, or the United States that is substantially equivalent to any of the offenses or violations described in division (A)(5)(a) of this section. (6) Upon receipt of a request pursuant to section 5153.111 of the Revised Code, a completed form prescribed pursuant to division (C)(1) of this section, and a set of fingerprint impressions obtained in the manner described in division (C)(2) of this section, the superintendent of the bureau of criminal identification and investigation shall conduct a criminal records check in the manner described in division (B) of this section to determine whether any information exists that indicates that the person who is the subject of the request previously has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to any of the following: (a) A violation of section 2903.01, 2903.02, 2903.03, 2903.04, 2903.11, 2903.12, 2903.13, 2903.16, 2903.21, 2903.34, 2905.01, 2905.02, 2905.05, 2907.02, 2907.03, 2907.04, 2907.05, 2907.06, 2907.07, 2907.08, 2907.09, 2907.21, 2907.22, 2907.23, 2907.25, 2907.31, 2907.32, 2907.321, 2907.322, 2907.323, 2909.02, 2909.03, 2911.01, 2911.02, 2911.11, 2911.12, 2919.12, 2919.22, 2919.24, 2919.25, 2923.12, 2923.13, 2923.161, 2925.02, 2925.03, 2925.04, 2925.05, 2925.06, or 3716.11 of the Revised Code, felonious sexual penetration in violation of former section 2907.12 of the Revised Code, a violation of section 2905.04 of the Revised Code as it existed prior to July 1, 1996, a violation of section 2919.23 of the Revised Code that would have been a violation of section 2905.04 of the Revised Code as it existed prior to July 1, 1996, had the violation been committed prior to that date, or a violation of section 2925.11 of the Revised Code that is not a minor drug possession offense; (b) A violation of an existing or former law of this state, any other state, or the United States that is substantially equivalent to any of the offenses listed in division (A)(6)(a) of this section. (7) On receipt of a request for a criminal records check from an individual pursuant to section 4749.03 or 4749.06 of the Revised Code, accompanied by a completed copy of the form prescribed in division (C)(1) of this section and a set of fingerprint impressions obtained in a manner described in division (C)(2) of this section, the superintendent of the bureau of criminal identification and investigation shall conduct a criminal records check in the manner described in division (B) of this section to determine whether any information exists indicating that the person who is the subject of the request has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to any criminal offense in this state or in any other state. If the individual indicates that a firearm will be carried in the course of business, the superintendent shall require information from the federal bureau of investigation as described in division (B)(2) of this section. Subject to division (F) of this section, the superintendent shall report the findings of the criminal records check and any information the federal bureau of investigation provides to the director of public safety. (8) On receipt of a request pursuant to section 1321.37, 1321.53, or 4763.05 of the Revised Code, a completed form prescribed pursuant to division (C)(1) of this section, and a set of fingerprint impressions obtained in the manner described in division (C)(2) of this section, the superintendent of the bureau of criminal identification and investigation shall conduct a criminal records check with respect to any person who has applied for a license, permit, or certification from the department of commerce or a division in the department. The superintendent shall conduct the criminal records check in the manner described in division (B) of this section to determine whether any information exists that indicates that the person who is the subject of the request previously has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to any criminal offense in this state, any other state, or the United States. (9) On receipt of a request for a criminal records check from the treasurer of state under section 113.041 of the Revised Code or from an individual under section 928.03, 4701.08, 4715.101, 4717.061, 4725.121, 4725.501, 4729.071, 4729.53, 4729.90, 4729.92, 4730.101, 4730.14, 4730.28, 4731.081, 4731.15, 4731.171, 4731.222, 4731.281, 4731.531, 4732.091, 4734.202, 4740.061, 4741.10, 4747.051, 4751.20, 4751.201, 4751.21, 4753.061, 4755.70, 4757.101, 4759.061, 4760.032, 4760.06, 4761.051, 4762.031, 4762.06, 4774.031, 4774.06, 4776.021, 4778.04, 4778.07, 4779.091, or 4783.04 of the Revised Code, accompanied by a completed form prescribed under division (C)(1) of this section and a set of fingerprint impressions obtained in the manner described in division (C)(2) of this section, the superintendent of the bureau of criminal identification and investigation shall conduct a criminal records check in the manner described in division (B) of this section to determine whether any information exists that indicates that the person who is the subject of the request has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to any criminal offense in this state or any other state. Subject to division (F) of this section, the superintendent shall send the results of a check requested under section 113.041 of the Revised Code to the treasurer of state and shall send the results of a check requested under any of the other listed sections to the licensing board specified by the individual in the request. (10) On receipt of a request pursuant to section 124.74, 718.131, 1121.23, 1315.141, 1733.47, or 1761.26 of the Revised Code, a completed form prescribed pursuant to division (C)(1) of this section, and a set of fingerprint impressions obtained in the manner described in division (C)(2) of this section, the superintendent of the bureau of criminal identification and investigation shall conduct a criminal records check in the manner described in division (B) of this section to determine whether any information exists that indicates that the person who is the subject of the request previously has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to any criminal offense under any existing or former law of this state, any other state, or the United States. (11) On receipt of a request for a criminal records check from an appointing or licensing authority under section 3772.07 of the Revised Code, a completed form prescribed under division (C)(1) of this section, and a set of fingerprint impressions obtained in the manner prescribed in division (C)(2) of this section, the superintendent of the bureau of criminal identification and investigation shall conduct a criminal records check in the manner described in division (B) of this section to determine whether any information exists that indicates that the person who is the subject of the request previously has been convicted of or pleaded guilty or no contest to any offense under any existing or former law of this state, any other state, or the United States that makes the person ineligible for appointment or retention under section 3772.07 of the Revised Code or that is a disqualifying offense as defined in that section or substantially equivalent to a disqualifying offense, as applicable. (12) On receipt of a request pursuant to section 2151.33 or 2151.412 of the Revised Code, a completed form prescribed pursuant to division (C)(1) of this section, and a set of fingerprint impressions obtained in the manner described in division (C)(2) of this section, the superintendent of the bureau of criminal identification and investigation shall conduct a criminal records check with respect to any person for whom a criminal records check is required under that section. The superintendent shall conduct the criminal records check in the manner described in division (B) of this section to determine whether any information exists that indicates that the person who is the subject of the request previously has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to any of the following: (a) A violation of section 2903.01, 2903.02, 2903.03, 2903.04, 2903.11, 2903.12, 2903.13, 2903.16, 2903.21, 2903.34, 2905.01, 2905.02, 2905.11, 2905.12, 2907.02, 2907.03, 2907.05, 2907.06, 2907.07, 2907.08, 2907.09, 2907.12, 2907.25, 2907.31, 2907.32, 2907.321, 2907.322, 2907.323, 2911.01, 2911.02, 2911.11, 2911.12, 2911.13, 2913.02, 2913.03, 2913.04, 2913.11, 2913.21, 2913.31, 2913.40, 2913.43, 2913.47, 2913.51, 2919.25, 2921.36, 2923.12, 2923.13, 2923.161, 2925.02, 2925.03, 2925.11, 2925.13, 2925.22, 2925.23, or 3716.11 of the Revised Code; (b) An existing or former law of this state, any other state, or the United States that is substantially equivalent to any of the offenses listed in division (A)(12)(a) of this section. (13) On receipt of a request pursuant to section 3796.12 of the Revised Code, a completed form prescribed pursuant to division (C)(1) of this section, and a set of fingerprint impressions obtained in a manner described in division (C)(2) of this section, the superintendent of the bureau of criminal identification and investigation shall conduct a criminal records check in the manner described in division (B) of this section to determine whether any information exists that indicates that the person who is the subject of the request previously has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to a disqualifying offense as specified in rules adopted under division (B)(2)(b) of section 3796.03 of the Revised Code if the person who is the subject of the request is an administrator or other person responsible for the daily operation of, or an owner or prospective owner, officer or prospective officer, or board member or prospective board member of, an entity seeking a license from the department of commerce under Chapter 3796. of the Revised Code. (14) On receipt of a request required by section 3796.13 of the Revised Code, a completed form prescribed pursuant to division (C)(1) of this section, and a set of fingerprint impressions obtained in a manner described in division (C)(2) of this section, the superintendent of the bureau of criminal identification and investigation shall conduct a criminal records check in the manner described in division (B) of this section to determine whether any information exists that indicates that the person who is the subject of the request previously has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to a disqualifying offense as specified in rules adopted under section 9.79 and division (B) of section 3796.03 of the Revised Code if the person who is the subject of the request is seeking employment with an entity licensed by the department of commerce under Chapter 3796. of the Revised Code. (15) On receipt of a request pursuant to section 4768.06 of the Revised Code, a completed form prescribed under division (C)(1) of this section, and a set of fingerprint impressions obtained in the manner described in division (C)(2) of this section, the superintendent of the bureau of criminal identification and investigation shall conduct a criminal records check in the manner described in division (B) of this section to determine whether any information exists indicating that the person who is the subject of the request has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to any criminal offense in this state or in any other state. (16) On receipt of a request pursuant to division (B) of section 4764.07 or division (A) of section 4735.143 of the Revised Code, a completed form prescribed under division (C)(1) of this section, and a set of fingerprint impressions obtained in the manner described in division (C)(2) of this section, the superintendent of the bureau of criminal identification and investigation shall conduct a criminal records check in the manner described in division (B) of this section to determine whether any information exists indicating that the person who is the subject of the request has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to any criminal offense in any state or the United States. (17) On receipt of a request for a criminal records check under section 147.022 of the Revised Code, a completed form prescribed under division (C)(1) of this section, and a set of fingerprint impressions obtained in the manner prescribed in division (C)(2) of this section, the superintendent of the bureau of criminal identification and investigation shall conduct a criminal records check in the manner described in division (B) of this section to determine whether any information exists that indicates that the person who is the subject of the request previously has been convicted of or pleaded guilty or no contest to any criminal offense under any existing or former law of this state, any other state, or the United States. (18) Upon receipt of a request pursuant to division (F) of section 2915.081 or division (E) of section 2915.082 of the Revised Code, a completed form prescribed under division (C)(1) of this section, and a set of fingerprint impressions obtained in the manner described in division (C)(2) of this section, the superintendent of the bureau of criminal identification and investigation shall conduct a criminal records check in the manner described in division (B) of this section to determine whether any information exists indicating that the person who is the subject of the request has been convicted of or pleaded guilty or no contest to any offense that is a violation of Chapter 2915. of the Revised Code or to any offense under any existing or former law of this state, any other state, or the United States that is substantially equivalent to such an offense. (19) On receipt of a request pursuant to section 3775.03 of the Revised Code, a completed form prescribed under division (C)(1) of this section, and a set of fingerprint impressions obtained in the manner described in division (C)(2) of this section, the superintendent of the bureau of criminal identification and investigation shall conduct a criminal records check in the manner described in division (B) of this section and shall request information from the federal bureau of investigation to determine whether any information exists indicating that the person who is the subject of the request has been convicted of any offense under any existing or former law of this state, any other state, or the United States that is a disqualifying offense as defined in section 3772.07 of the Revised Code. (20) On receipt of a request pursuant to section 3724.05 of the Revised Code, a completed form prescribed pursuant to division (C)(1) of this section, and a set of fingerprint impressions obtained in a manner described in division (C)(2) of this section, the superintendent of the bureau of criminal identification and investigation shall conduct a criminal records check in the manner described in division (B) of this section to determine whether any information exists that indicates that the person who is the subject of the request previously has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to a disqualifying offense as specified in rules adopted under division (B) of section 3724.03 of the Revised Code. (B) Subject to division (F) of this section, the superintendent shall conduct any criminal records check to be conducted under this section as follows: (1) The superintendent shall review or cause to be reviewed any relevant information gathered and compiled by the bureau under division (A) of section 109.57 of the Revised Code that relates to the person who is the subject of the criminal records check, including, if the criminal records check was requested under section 113.041, 121.08, 124.74, 173.27, 173.38, 173.381, 718.131, 928.03, 1121.23, 1315.141, 1321.37, 1321.53, 1733.47, 1761.26, 2151.86, 3301.32, 3301.541, 3319.39, 3740.11, 3712.09, 3721.121, 3772.07, 3775.03, 3796.12, 3796.13, 4729.071, 4729.53, 4729.90, 4729.92, 4749.03, 4749.06, 4763.05, 4764.07, 4768.06, 5103.053, 5104.013, 5164.34, 5164.341, 5164.342, 5123.081, 5123.169, or 5153.111 of the Revised Code, any relevant information contained in records that have been sealed under section 2953.32 of the Revised Code; (2) If the request received by the superintendent asks for information from the federal bureau of investigation, the superintendent shall request from the federal bureau of investigation any information it has with respect to the person who is the subject of the criminal records check, including fingerprint-based checks of national crime information databases as described in 42 U.S.C. 671 if the request is made pursuant to section 2151.86, 5103.053, or 5104.013 of the Revised Code or if any other Revised Code section requires fingerprint-based checks of that nature, and shall review or cause to be reviewed any information the superintendent receives from that bureau. If a request under section 3319.39 of the Revised Code asks only for information from the federal bureau of investigation, the superintendent shall not conduct the review prescribed by division (B)(1) of this section. (3) The superintendent or the superintendent's designee may request criminal history records from other states or the federal government pursuant to the national crime prevention and privacy compact set forth in section 109.571 of the Revised Code. (4) The superintendent shall include in the results of the criminal records check a list or description of the offenses listed or described in the relevant provision of division (A) of this section. The superintendent shall exclude from the results any information the dissemination of which is prohibited by federal law. (5) The superintendent shall send the results of the criminal records check to the person to whom it is to be sent not later than the following number of days after the date the superintendent receives the request for the criminal records check, the completed form prescribed under division (C)(1) of this section, and the set of fingerprint impressions obtained in the manner described in division (C)(2) of this section: (a) If the superintendent is required by division (A) of this section (other than division (A)(3) of this section) to conduct the criminal records check, thirty; (b) If the superintendent is required by division (A)(3) of this section to conduct the criminal records check, sixty. (C)(1) The superintendent shall prescribe a form to obtain the information necessary to conduct a criminal records check from any person for whom a criminal records check is to be conducted under this section. The form that the superintendent prescribes pursuant to this division may be in a tangible format, in an electronic format, or in both tangible and electronic formats. (2) The superintendent shall prescribe standard impression sheets to obtain the fingerprint impressions of any person for whom a criminal records check is to be conducted under this section. Any person for whom a records check is to be conducted under this section shall obtain the fingerprint impressions at a county sheriff's office, municipal police department, or any other entity with the ability to make fingerprint impressions on the standard impression sheets prescribed by the superintendent. The office, department, or entity may charge the person a reasonable fee for making the impressions. The standard impression sheets the superintendent prescribes pursuant to this division may be in a tangible format, in an electronic format, or in both tangible and electronic formats. (3) Subject to division (D) of this section, the superintendent shall prescribe and charge a reasonable fee for providing a criminal records check under this section. The person requesting the criminal records check shall pay the fee prescribed pursuant to this division. In the case of a request under section 1121.23, 1155.03, 1163.05, 1315.141, 1733.47, 1761.26, 2151.33, 2151.412, or 5164.34 of the Revised Code, the fee shall be paid in the manner specified in that section. (4) The superintendent of the bureau of criminal identification and investigation may prescribe methods of forwarding fingerprint impressions and information necessary to conduct a criminal records check, which methods shall include, but not be limited to, an electronic method. (D) The results of a criminal records check conducted under this section, other than a criminal records check specified in division (A)(7) of this section, are valid for the person who is the subject of the criminal records check for a period of one year from the date upon which the superintendent completes the criminal records check. If during that period the superintendent receives another request for a criminal records check to be conducted under this section for that person, the superintendent shall provide the results from the previous criminal records check of the person at a lower fee than the fee prescribed for the initial criminal records check. (E) When the superintendent receives a request for information from a registered private provider, the superintendent shall proceed as if the request was received from a school district board of education under section 3319.39 of the Revised Code. The superintendent shall apply division (A)(1)(c) of this section to any such request for an applicant who is a teacher. (F)(1) Subject to division (F)(2) of this section, all information regarding the results of a criminal records check conducted under this section that the superintendent reports or sends under division (A)(7) or (9) of this section to the director of public safety, the treasurer of state, or the person, board, or entity that made the request for the criminal records check shall relate to the conviction of the subject person, or the subject person's plea of guilty to, a criminal offense. (2) Division (F)(1) of this section does not limit, restrict, or preclude the superintendent's release of information that relates to the arrest of a person who is eighteen years of age or older, to an adjudication of a child as a delinquent child, or to a criminal conviction of a person under eighteen years of age in circumstances in which a release of that nature is authorized under division (E)(2), (3), or (4) of section 109.57 of the Revised Code pursuant to a rule adopted under division (E)(1) of that section. (G) As used in this section: (1) "Criminal records check" means any criminal records check conducted by the superintendent of the bureau of criminal identification and investigation in accordance with division (B) of this section. (2) "Minor drug possession offense" has the same meaning as in section 2925.01 of the Revised Code. (3) "OVI or OVUAC violation" means a violation of section 4511.19 of the Revised Code or a violation of an existing or former law of this state, any other state, or the United States that is substantially equivalent to section 4511.19 of the Revised Code. (4) "Registered private provider" means a nonpublic school or entity registered with the department of education and workforce under section 3310.41 of the Revised Code to participate in the autism scholarship program or section 3310.58 of the Revised Code to participate in the Jon Peterson special needs scholarship program. Sec. 503.41. (A) A board of township trustees, by resolution, may regulate and require the registration of massage establishments and their employees within the unincorporated territory of the township. In accordance with sections 503.40 to 503.49 of the Revised Code, for that purpose, the board, by a majority vote of all members, may adopt, amend, administer, and enforce regulations within the unincorporated territory of the township, including regulations to do the following: (1) Limit operable hours for massage establishments; (2) Require distance buffers from hotels and other high trafficking corridors; (3) Require visible lobby areas and surveillance retention; (4) Prohibit residential occupancy inside massage establishments. (B) A board may adopt regulations and amendments under this section only after public hearing at not fewer than two regular sessions of the board. The board shall publish notice of the public hearings, including the time, date, and place, once a week for two weeks immediately preceding the hearings using at least one of the following methods: (1) In the print or digital edition of a newspaper of general circulation in the township; (2) On the official public notice web site established under section 125.182 of the Revised Code; (3) On the web site and social media account of the township. The board shall make available proposed regulations or amendments to the public at the office of the board. (C) Regulations or amendments adopted by the board are effective thirty days after the date of adoption unless, within thirty days after the adoption of the regulations or amendments, the township fiscal officer receives a petition, signed by a number of qualified electors residing in the unincorporated area of the township equal to not less than ten per cent of the total vote cast for all candidates for governor in the area at the most recent general election at which a governor was elected, requesting the board to submit the regulations or amendments to the electors of the area for approval or rejection at the next primary or general election occurring at least ninety days after the board receives the petition. No regulation or amendment for which the referendum vote has been requested is effective unless a majority of the votes cast on the issue is in favor of the regulation or amendment. Upon certification by the board of elections that a majority of the votes cast on the issue was in favor of the regulation or amendment, the regulation or amendment takes immediate effect. (D) The board shall make available regulations it adopts or amends to the public at the office of the board and shall cause to be published once a notice of the availability of the regulations within ten days after their adoption or amendment, using at least one of the following methods: (1) In the print or digital edition of a newspaper of general circulation in the township; (2) On the official public notice web site established under section 125.182 of the Revised Code; (3) On the web site and social media account of the township. (E) Nothing in sections 503.40 to 503.49 of the Revised Code shall be construed to allow a board of township trustees toregulate to regulate the practice of any limited branch of medicine specified in section 4731.15 of the Revised Code or the practice of providing therapeutic massage by a licensed physician, a licensed chiropractor, a licensed podiatrist, a licensed nurse, or any other licensed health professional. As used in this division, "licensed" means licensed, certified, or registered to practice in this state. (F) If a township adopts regulations to require the registration of massage establishments and their employees, the township shall comply with Chapter 4796. of the Revised Code. Sec. 2905.34. (A) As used in this section, "massage operations" means activities conducted by the following: (1) A massage business, as that term is defined in section 3724.01 of the Revised Code and that is subject to the requirements of sections 3724.01 to 3724.07 of the Revised Code; (2) A massage professional subject to licensure under section 715.61 of the Revised Code; (3) A massage establishment, as that term is defined in section 503.40 of the Revised Code, that is subject to the requirements of sections 503.40 to 503.50 of the Revised Code; (4) A person conducting activities for which licensure is required, but not obtained, under sections 503.40 to 503.50 of the Revised Code, section 715.61 of the Revised Code, or sections 3724.01 to 3724.07 of the Revised Code. (B) No person, knowing that property is the proceeds of a violation of section 2905.32 of the Revised Code involving massage operations or a monetary instrument given, received, or intended to be used in support of a violation of section 2905.32 of the Revised Code involving massage operations, shall knowingly conduct or attempt to conduct any transaction involving that property or knowingly transport, transmit, or transfer that monetary instrument with the intent to do any of the following: (1) Commit or further the commission of criminal activity; (2) Conceal or disguise the nature, location, source, ownership, or control of either the proceeds of a violation of section 2905.32 of the Revised Code involving massage operations or a monetary instrument given, received, or intended to be used to support a violation of section 2905.32 of the Revised Code involving massage operations; (3) Conceal or disguise the intent to avoid the reporting requirement under section 109.451 of the Revised Code. (C) Whoever violates this section is guilty of money laundering through massage operations, a felony of the third degree. Sec. 3724.01. As used in this chapter: (A) "Massage business" means a commercial enterprise where a person offers massage therapy in exchange for anything of value. (B) "Massage therapist" means an individual licensed under Chapter 4731. of the Revised Code to practice massage therapy. (C) "Massage therapy" has the same meaning as in section 4731.04 of the Revised Code. Sec. 3724.02. (A) No person shall operate a massage business without holding a license issued by the director of health under this section. (B) Every person that proposes to operate a massage business shall apply to the director of health for a license. Application shall be made on forms prescribed by the director, shall include such information as the director requires, and shall be accompanied by the license fee established by rules of the director of health adopted under section 3724.03 of the Revised Code. The application shall include the report of each criminal records check requested pursuant to division (D) of this section. The director shall grant a license to the applicant if the applicant is in compliance with this chapter and rules adopted under it. (C) A license granted under this section shall be valid for two years unless revoked or suspended. Application for renewal of a license shall be made in the same manner as for an initial license and shall be accompanied by the renewal fee established by rules of the director of health adopted under section 3724.03 of the Revised Code. (D) Each person applying for a massage business license under this section shall request that the superintendent of the bureau of criminal identification and investigation conduct a criminal records check of each owner of the massage business in the same manner as a criminal records check is requested for an applicant pursuant to section 3724.05 of the Revised Code. Sec. 3724.03. (A) In accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code, the director of health shall adopt, and may amend and rescind, rules that do both of the following: (1) Create application procedures for massage business licenses pursuant to section 3724.02; (2) Establish fees for massage business licenses pursuant to section 3724.02. (B) The director may adopt any other rules as necessary to implement this chapter, including rules consistent with section 9.79 of the Revised Code that specify offenses for which a conviction or guilty plea require a massage business to deny employment to an applicant pursuant to section 3724.05 of the Revised Code. Sec. 3724.04. Each massage business shall do both of the following: (A) Provide each employee, at the time of hire, with a copy of the notices required to be posted under sections 4111.09, 4112.07, 4123.54, and 4123.83 of the Revised Code in the employee's native language; (B) Display both of the following in a publicly visible location: (1) The contact information for an anti-trafficking hotline; (2) Proof that each individual employed by the massage business to perform massage therapy is licensed as a massage therapist under Chapter 4731. of the Revised Code. Sec. 3724.05. (A) As used in this section: (1) "Applicant" means a person who is under final consideration for employment at a licensed massage business. (2) "Criminal records check" has the same meaning as in section 109.572 of the Revised Code. (B)(1) The owner of a massage business shall request that the superintendent of the bureau of criminal identification and investigation conduct a criminal records check of each applicant. If an applicant for whom a criminal records check request is required under this division does not present proof of having been a resident of this state for the five-year period immediately prior to the date the criminal records check is requested or provide evidence that within that five-year period the superintendent has requested information about the applicant from the federal bureau of investigation in a criminal records check, the owner shall request that the superintendent obtain information from the federal bureau of investigation as part of the criminal records check of the applicant. Even if an applicant for whom a criminal records check request is required under this division presents proof of having been a resident of this state for the five-year period, the owner may request that the superintendent include information from the federal bureau of investigation in the criminal records check. (2) A person required by division (B)(1) of this section to request a criminal records check shall do both of the following: (a) Provide to each applicant for whom a criminal records check request is required under that division a copy of the form prescribed pursuant to division (C)(1) of section 109.572 of the Revised Code and a standard fingerprint impression sheet prescribed pursuant to division (C)(2) of that section, and obtain the completed form and impression sheet from the applicant; (b) Forward the completed form and impression sheet to the superintendent of the bureau of criminal identification and investigation. (3) An applicant provided the form and fingerprint impression sheet under division (B)(2)(a) of this section who fails to complete the form or provide fingerprint impressions shall not be employed by the massage business. (C) No massage business shall employ a person who has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to an offense specified by rules of the director of health adopted under section 3724.03 of the Revised Code. (D)(1) Each massage business shall pay to the bureau of criminal identification and investigation the fee prescribed pursuant to division (C)(3) of section 109.572 of the Revised Code for each criminal records check conducted pursuant to a request made under division (B) of this section. (2) A massage business may charge an applicant a fee not exceeding the amount the program pays under division (D)(1) of this section. A massage business may collect a fee only if the program notifies the person at the time of initial application for employment of the amount of the fee and that, unless the fee is paid, the person will not be considered for employment. (E) The report of a criminal records check conducted pursuant to a request made under this section is not a public record for the purposes of section 149.43 of the Revised Code and shall not be made available to any person other than the following: (1) The individual who is the subject of the criminal records check or the individual's representative; (2) The owner of the massage business requesting the criminal records check or the owner's representative; (3) A court, hearing officer, or other necessary individual involved in a case dealing with a denial of employment of the applicant or dealing with employment or unemployment benefits of the applicant; (4) The director of health. (F) The owner of a massage business shall inform each individual, at the time of initial application, that the individual is required to provide a set of fingerprint impressions and that a criminal records check is required to be conducted if the individual comes under final consideration for employment. (G) The owner of a massage business shall submit the report of each criminal records check conducted pursuant to this section to the director of health within ten calendar days of hiring a new employee. Sec. 3724.06. Each owner of a licensed massage business shall do both of the following every two years: (A) Request that the superintendent of the bureau of criminal identification and investigation conduct a criminal records check on each owner of the massage business and each employee of the massage business in the same manner as a criminal records check is conducted for an applicant pursuant to section 3724.05 of the Revised Code; (B) Submit the report of each criminal records check conducted pursuant to this section to the director of health. Sec. 3724.07. (A) At least once annually, the director of health shall inspect each licensed massage business. (B) The director may at any time inspect a licensed massage business to address an incident that may impact public health and safety, respond to a complaint submitted to the director, or otherwise ensure the massage business is in compliance with this chapter and other state and federal laws. (C) The director shall immediately suspend the license of any massage business found to be doing any of the following: (1) Employing individuals to provide massage therapy who are not licensed to practice massage therapy under Chapter 4731. of the Revised Code; (2) Maintaining locked sleeping quarters; (3) Receiving only cash payments without maintaining accurate payroll records; (4) Refusing inspection. Sec. 3724.99. (A) Whoever knowingly violates division (A) of section 3724.02 of the Revised Code is guilty of a felony of the third degree. (B) Whoever knowingly violates division (B)(1) or (2) of section 3724.04 of the Revised Code, division (B) or (G) of section 3724.05 of the Revised Code, or division (A) or (B) of section 3724.06 of the Revised Code, is guilty of a misdemeanor of the first degree. Sec. 3767.10. (A) If a tenant or occupant of a building or tenement, under a lawful title, uses such place for the purposes of lewdness, assignation, or prostitution, such use makes void the lease or other title under which he the tenant or occupant holds, at the option of the owner, and, without any act of the owner, causes the right of possession to revert and vest in such owner, who may without process of law make immediate entry upon the premises. (B) If a building or tenement is utilized for the purposes of lewdness, assignation, or prostitution on an ongoing or recurrent basis, the attorney general may file an expedited civil action to prohibit the operation of any business in the building by a tenant or occupant who is the alleged perpetrator of the lewdness, assignation, or prostitution. Where the property owner knows or reasonably should have known about the ongoing or recurrent lewdness, assignation, or prostitution, the court shall impose civil penalties upon the building owner. The court shall transmit a copy of the final order in a civil case under this section against a property owner to the tax commissioner. (C) If the court imposes a civil penalty upon a building owner under division (B) of this section, the parcel encompassing the building or tenement utilized for the purposes of lewdness, assignation, or prostitution shall be ineligible for any real property tax reduction, credit, or exemption for the tax year that includes the date of the final order and either the following tax year or through the tax year that includes the date that the business violating division (A) of this section vacates the premises, whichever is sooner. The tax commissioner shall notify the county auditor of any such ineligible property. Sec. 5101.87. (A) There is hereby created in the treasury of state the victims of human trafficking fund consisting of money seized in connection with a violation of section 2905.32, 2907.21, or 2907.22 of the Revised Code or acquired from the sale of personal effects, tools, or other property seized because the personal effects, tools, or other property were used in the commission of a violation of section 2905.32, 2907.21, or 2907.22 of the Revised Code or derived from the proceeds of the commission of a violation of section 2905.32, 2907.21, or 2907.22 of the Revised Code and deposited pursuant to section 2981.12 of the Revised Code and such other money as may be appropriated or contributed to the fund. (B) Money in the fund shall be used for the sole purpose of treating, caring for, rehabilitating, educating, housing, and providing assistance for victims of trafficking in persons, including legal aid and relocation services. The office of the attorney general shall administer the fund. Sec. 5502.71. There is hereby created the local notification of human trafficking database. The database shall be operated jointly by the department of public safety and the department of health. The database shall be publicly available and shall contain the locations of identified human trafficking organizations in the state, known names and aliases of offenders convicted of or who have pleaded guilty to a violation of section 2905.32 of the Revised Code, and any licenses forfeited due to an offense related to human trafficking or prostitution. Section 2. That existing sections 109.572, 503.41, 3767.10, and 5101.87 of the Revised Code are hereby repealed. Section 3. On the effective date of this section, or as soon as possible thereafter, the Director of Health shall certify to the Director of Budget and Management the amount necessary to fund the local notification of human trafficking database created in section 5502.71 of the Revised Code. The amount certified is hereby appropriated to appropriation item 440485, Health Program Support, for fiscal year 2027.